Utah statutes.
41-4-4.   Giving of gratuity by manufacturer or wholesaler to one financing
sales which lessens competition, unlawful.
It shall be unlawful for any person who is engaged, directly or indirectly, in
the manufacture or wholesale distribution only of motor vehicles, whether
patented or unpatented, to pay or give, or contract to pay or give any thing
or service of value to any person who is engaged in the business of financing
the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or of buying conditional sales
contracts, chattel mortgages or leases on motor vehicles sold at retail within
this state if the effect of any such payment or the giving of any such thing
or service of value may be to lessen or eliminate competition, or tend to
create or create a monopoly in the person or class of persons who receive or
accept such thing or service of value.
